Nebraska, session 109, LB903.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 68-1212, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
68-1212 For all cases in which a court has awarded a juvenile to the care
of the Department of Health and Human Services according to subsection (1) of
section 43-285 and for any noncourt and voluntary cases, the case manager shall
be an employee of the department. Such case manager shall be responsible for
and shall directly oversee: Case planning; service authorization; investigation
of compliance; monitoring and evaluation of the care and services provided to
children and families; and decisionmaking regarding the determination of
visitation and the care, placement, medical services, psychiatric services,
training, and expenditures on behalf of each juvenile under subsection (1) of
section 43-285. Such case manager shall be responsible for decisionmaking and
direct preparation regarding the proposed plan for the care, placement,
services, and permanency of the juvenile filed with the court required under
subsection (2) of section 43-285. The health and safety of the juvenile shall
be the paramount concern in the proposed plan. When appropriate, the case
manager may refer (1) families with a child, two years of age or younger, for
evidence-based home visitation services as provided in the Family Home
Visitation Act and (2) families with a child, three years of age or younger, to
early intervention services as defined in section 43-2505.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-1212, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
Sec. 3. The following section is outright repealed: Section 68-2306,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025.
-1-